District of Columbia statutes.
7-1703.04

No smoking within 25 feet of property signs.

(a)

A property owner or ground-floor commercial tenant has the authority to post signs on his or her property stating that smoking is not permitted on public space within a specified distance from and abutting the building wall. That distance shall not be greater than 25 feet or the distance to the far side of the adjacent public sidewalk, if any, whichever is less.

(b)

An authorized sidewalk café shall not be subject to a no-smoking sign posted pursuant to this section unless the sign has been posted by, or with the consent of, the owner or operator of the sidewalk café.

(c)

The penalties in § 7-1721.06 shall not apply to this section.

Sept. 28, 1979, D.C. Law 3-22, § 4d
as added July 23, 2010, D.C. Law 18-189, § 2, 57 DCR 3019
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 52(a), 59 DCR 6190
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 redesignated D.C. Law 3-22, § 4c as D.C. Law 3-22, § 4d.